California statutes. Public Utilities Code
If after the bids have been rejected, the board determines and declares by a four-fifths vote of all the members of a five-ward district, or by a five-sevenths vote of all the members of a seven-ward district, that in its opinion the materials and supplies may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the board may proceed, or may authorize the general manager to proceed, to purchase the supplies and materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 465, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12753.

In case of any great emergency, the board may, by resolution passed by a four-fifths vote of all the members of a five-ward district, or by a five-sevenths vote of all the members of a seven-ward district, declare and determine that such emergency exists, and thereupon proceed to expend sums or enter into contracts involving the expenditure of any sums needed in such emergency without observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 337.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Property [12771. - 12773.]

12771.

A district may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, or lease, or condemn in proceedings under eminent domain, or otherwise acquire, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The board may lease, mortgage, sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property within or without the district when in its judgment it is for the best interests of the district so to do. The provisions of this section apply to all sales or mortgages heretofore or hereafter made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12772.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12773.

(a) For purposes of this section, “security” has the same meaning as defined in Section 25019 of the Corporations Code.

(b) The Sacramento Municipal Utility District may operate a program under which the board of directors of the district may hold nonstock security in a corporation or other private entity if acquired as part of a procurement of goods or services from that entity, or as full or partial consideration for providing that entity services or access to district facilities, if separate funding is not expended solely for the nonstock security. The board of directors of the district may sell or otherwise dispose of the nonstock security when, in its judgment, it is in the best
 interests of the district to do so.

(c) Before exercising the authority described in subdivision (b), the district’s board of directors shall do all of the following:

(1) Make all of the following findings:

(A) The acquisition furthers the purposes of the district, pursuant to this division.

(B) The acquisition is in the interest of the district’s ratepayers and the public.

(2) Establish a policy governing acquisitions that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Procedures for preventing conflicts of interest and
 violations of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090) of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(B) Procedures for determining how much of an acquisition to accept in lieu of, or in addition to, other forms of remuneration, in order to ensure the district secures a reasonable return on any intellectual property or other resources it provides the private entity.

(C) Procedures governing the approval process for accepting any acquisitions.

(D) Procedures that ensure acquisition of a nonstock security does not unduly influence the amount paid for the associated goods and services.

(3) Post the policy described in paragraph (2) on the
 district’s internet website.

(4) Adopt a resolution at a regular meeting of the board stating the intent of the board to exercise the authority described in subdivision (b).

(d) The authority described in subdivision (b) shall be limited to a total of six acquisitions. Any profit or other gain earned by an acquisition shall be used to benefit the district’s ratepayers.

(e) The value, at the time of acquisition, of any single nonstock security acquired pursuant to the authority described in subdivision (b) shall be limited to no more than 3 percent of the
 district’s annual revenue in the fiscal year the district makes the acquisition.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 400, Sec. 1.   (AB 2457)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Utility Works and Service [12801. - 12827.]

12801.

A district may acquire, construct, own, operate, control, or use, within or without, or partly within or partly without, the district, works or parts of works for supplying the inhabitants of the district and public agencies therein, or some of them, with light, water, power, heat, transportation, telephone service, or other means of communication, or means for the collection, treatment, or disposition of garbage, sewage, or refuse matter, and may do all things necessary or convenient to the full exercise of the powers herein granted. The district may also purchase any of such commodities or services from any other utility district, public agency, person, or private
 company, and distribute them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12801.5.

A district that provides broadband Internet access services shall comply with the requirements of Article 12 (commencing with Section 53167) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 963, Sec. 7.   (AB 1999)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12802.

A district may accept, without limitation by any other provisions of this division requiring approval of indebtedness, contributions of money, rights of way, labor, materials, and any other property for the construction, maintenance, and operation of any enterprise in which the district is authorized to engage, and may enter into any contracts and cooperate with and accept cooperation from the State, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, or any public agency of the State in the construction, maintenance, and operation of, and in financing the construction, maintenance, and operation of, any such enterprise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12803.

Except as provided in this division with reference to sewage disposal, a district shall not interfere with or exercise any control over any existing utility owned and operated by any public agency in the district, unless by consent of the legislative body of the public agency and upon such terms as are mutually agreed upon between the board and the legislative body of the public agency.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12804.

Whenever there is a surplus of water, light, heat, or power above that which is required by inhabitants or public agencies within a district, the district may sell or otherwise dispose of the surplus outside of the district to persons, firms, and public or private corporations, or public agencies outside the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12805.

Whenever any of the facilities, works, or utilities of the district, or part thereof, is not used or employed to its fullest capacity for the benefit or requirements of the district or its inhabitants, the district may enter into an agreement with public agencies or any person, firm, or corporation, upon such terms and conditions as are satisfactory to the board, for renting, leasing, or otherwise using the available portion or parts of the facilities, works, or utilities, and in connection with any such agreement, renting, or leasing the district may undertake or perform any services incidental thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12806.

The district and any public agencies included therein may at any time enter into appropriate contracts for the use by any such public agencies of commodities or service furnished by any of the works acquired, owned, or operated, or authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by the district, or of any of the facilities of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12807.

A district may sell or otherwise dispose of any water, sewage effluent, fertilizer, or other by-product resulting from the operation of a sewage disposal system, and may construct, maintain, and operate such pipelines and other works as are necessary for that purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12808.

A district may construct works across or along any street or public highway, or over any of the lands which are the property of the State, and it shall have the same rights and privileges appertaining thereto as are granted to municipalities within the State. The district shall restore any such street or highway to its former state as near as may be, and in compliance with local ordinances, and shall not use it in a manner to unnecessarily impair its usefulness. A district may also construct its works across any stream or watercourse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1260.)
-------------------------------------------

12808.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 53091 and 65402 of the Government Code, Section 12808 of the Public Utilities Code and Section 1469 of the Streets and Highways Code or any other provision of law, no district may locate or construct, any lines, for the transmission or distribution of electrical energy, including poles and other accessory structures, unless such facilities are approved pursuant to this section.

(b) The district shall hold a public hearing on proposed facilities which are subject to this section.

(1) Mailed notice
 of the public hearing shall be provided at least 10 days prior to the hearing, to the owners of all property within 300 feet of the route along which such facilities are proposed to be located.

(2) If mailed notice as required in paragraph (1) above would result in notice to more than 250 persons, as an alternative to such mailed notice, notice may be given by placing a display advertisement of at least one-fourth page in a newspaper of general circulation within the area affected by the proposed facility.

(c) After holding a hearing as provided in subdivision (b), the district shall submit any proposed facilities to the legislative body of each local agency in which such facilities are to be located. The legislative bodies shall conduct a public hearing, receive evidence, and, within 60 days, adopt a resolution approving, approving an alternative, or disapproving, the proposed
 facilities.

Any resolution adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall contain findings concerning:

(1) The consistency of the proposed facilities with the local agency’s general plan and applicable redevelopment and specific plans.

(2) Whether there are feasible alternatives to the proposal.

(3) Such other factors related to the public health, safety and welfare as are included within the ordinance adopted by the local agency pursuant to subdivision (e) of this section.

Failure of a legislative body to render a decision within 60 days shall be deemed to constitute an approval of the proposed facilities.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (c), the
 governing board of the district by vote of four-fifths of its members may render a local agency’s decision inapplicable to proposed facilities if the district, at a publicly noticed hearing, determines by resolution that there is no feasible alternative to the district’s proposal. Prior to adopting the resolution, the district shall read into the record the local agency’s resolution. The board shall, within 10 days, notify the city or county concerned of such action. If the governing board has taken such action the local agency may commence an action in the superior court of the county whose action is involved or in which is situated the city whose action is involved, seeking a review of such action of the governing board of the district to determine whether it was supported by substantial evidence. The evidence before the court shall include, but not be limited to, the record of the proceedings before the city, county, and local agency. The city or county shall cause a copy of the complaint to be served on
 the board. If the court determines that such action was not supported by substantial evidence, it shall declare it to be of no force and effect, and the local agency’s decision shall be applicable to the proposed facilities.

(e) This section shall not apply to:

(1) Any facilities proposed to be located within any local agency which has not adopted an ordinance setting forth criteria to govern its decision pursuant to subdivision (c) of this section.

(2) Any electrical distribution lines of less than 100,000 volts.

(f) As used in this section, the term “feasible” means capable of being accomplished in a successful manner within a reasonable period of time, taking into account economic, environmental, social, and technological factors.

(g) As used in this section, “local agency” means a city, a city and county, or a county. Within cities this section shall not apply to counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 324.)
-------------------------------------------

12809.

The rates and charges for commodities or service furnished by a district shall be fixed by the board. As far as possible utilities shall be self-supporting but the board is not required to fix a rate which in its opinion is unreasonably high, nor to cover by rates large expenditures and the interest thereon required for future needs and developments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12810.

The board may provide that rates, tolls, and charges for any sewage disposal enterprise or service may be collected with the rates, tolls, and charges for any water or other utility service rendered by the district, and that all rates may be billed upon the same bill and collected as one item. If charges for water and sewage disposal service are billed upon the same bill the district may discontinue water service in the event of failure to pay the whole or any part of the bill.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12811.

The board may provide for the collection of fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges in any lawful manner and may provide for collection by action at law, and all remedies for the collection and enforcement thereof are cumulative and may be pursued alternatively or consecutively as the board determines. In addition to the amount of the fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges, the board may provide for a penalty of not more than 10 percent or interest at the prevailing prime interest rate, but not to exceed 112 percent per month, or both, in the
 event of nonpayment within the time and in the manner prescribed by the board, and may provide for collection of the penalty and interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 589, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12811.1.

(a) Except when prohibited by Section 12822.6, a district may, by resolution or ordinance, require the owner of record of real property within the district to pay the fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges for services rendered to a lessee, tenant, or subtenant, and those fees, tolls, rates, rentals, and other charges that have become delinquent, together with interest and penalties thereon, are a lien on the property when a certificate is filed in the office of the county recorder pursuant to subdivision (b) and the lien has the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien. No lien may be created under this section on any publicly owned property.

(b) A lien under this section
 attaches when the district files for recordation in the office of the county recorder a certificate specifying the amount of the delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges together with interest and penalties thereon; the name of the owner of record of the property to which services were rendered by the district; and the legal description of the property. Within 30 days of receipt of payment of all amounts due, including recordation fees paid by the district, the district shall file for recordation a release of the lien.

(c) A district may, by resolution or ordinance, provide that any delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges, together with interest and penalties thereon, including any delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges for services rendered to a lessee, tenant, or subtenant, may be collected
 on the tax roll in the same manner as property taxes. Before any entity may collect any delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges, together with interest and penalties thereon, including any delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges for services rendered to a lessee, tenant, or subtenant on the tax roll, the district shall prepare a report, provide notice, conduct a public hearing, and file a certificate in the office of the county recorder, as follows:

(1) The general manager shall prepare and file with the district board of directors a report that describes each affected parcel of real property and the amount of the delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges, together with interest and penalties thereon, including any delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges for services
 rendered to a lessee, tenant, or subtenant for each affected parcel for the year. The general manager shall give notice of the filing of the report and of the time, date, and place for a public hearing by publishing the notice pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation, and by mailing the notice to the owner of each affected parcel at least 14 days prior to the date of the hearing.

(2) At the public hearing, the board of directors shall hear and consider any objections or protests to the report. At the conclusion of the public hearing, the board of directors may adopt or revise the delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges, together with interest and penalties thereon, including any delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges for services rendered to a lessee, tenant, or
 subtenant. The board of directors shall make its determination on each affected parcel and its determinations shall be final.

(3) On or before August 10 of each year following these determinations, the general manager shall file with the county auditor a copy of the final report adopted by the board of directors. The county auditor shall enter the amount of the delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges, together with interest and penalties thereon, including any delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges for services rendered to a lessee, tenant, or subtenant, against each of the affected parcels of real property as they appear on the current assessment roll. The county tax collector shall include the amount of the delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or charges, together with interest and penalties thereon,
 including any delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges for services rendered to a lessee, tenant, or subtenant, on the tax bills for each affected parcel of real property and collect the delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or charges, together with interest and penalties thereon, including any delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges for services rendered to a lessee, tenant, or subtenant, in the same manner as property taxes.

(4) The district may recover any delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges, together with interest and penalties thereon, including any delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges for services rendered to a lessee, tenant, or subtenant, by recording in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the affected parcel is located, a
 certificate declaring the amount of the delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or charges, together with interest and penalties thereon, including any delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges for services rendered to a lessee, tenant, or subtenant, due, and the name and last known address of the person liable therefor. From the time of recordation of the certificate, the amount of the delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or charges, together with interest and penalties thereon, including any delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges for services rendered to a lessee, tenant, or subtenant, constitutes a lien against the affected real property of the delinquent property owner in that county. This
 lien shall have the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien. Within 30 days of receipt of payment of all amounts due, including recordation fees paid by the district, the district shall file for recordation a release of the lien.

(5) The district shall not recover on the tax roll any delinquent fees, tolls, rates, rentals, or other charges for services for commercial use to a commercial tenant under an account established by the commercial tenant, from any subsequent tenant or the property owner, due to nonpayment of charges by a previous commercial tenant. For this purpose, the term “subsequent commercial tenant” shall not include an entity or adult person that was located at the same address during the period the charges or penalties accrued. This paragraph does not apply to master-metered accounts.

(d) Notwithstanding Sections 6103 and 27383 of the Government Code, in filing any instrument, paper, or notice pursuant to this section, the district shall pay all applicable recording fees prescribed by law.

(e) A district shall reimburse the county for the reasonable expenses incurred by the county pursuant to this section.

(f) The remedies in this section are cumulative and in addition to any other remedy provided by law. The district may pursue remedies alternatively or consecutively.

(g) This section does not apply to delinquent fees or charges for the furnishing of electrical service.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 485, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   (SB 188)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12811.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a district may establish a temporary relief program for assistance to needy customers of the district who are financially unable to pay in full bills for services furnished by the district within the normal period for payment thereof, and may expend funds, enter into contracts, and cooperate with and accept cooperation from any state or local public agency or private nonprofit organization in the implementation of such a program.

(b) As used in this section, “needy” means either of the following:

(1) A household with an income which does not exceed the greater of either (A) an amount equal to 150 percent of the poverty level of this state, as determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 16367.5 of the Government Code, or (B) an amount equal to 60 percent of the state median income.

(2) A household with an income which meets guidelines for existing public assistance programs funded by the federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 316, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12812.

The board may apportion all or a portion of the expenses of operation and maintenance of any sewage disposal facilities constructed by the district, and the interest on any bonds issued therefor, among the public agencies whose sewers are connected with district facilities. The board shall establish rules for determining the apportionment, which among other things shall be based on the quantity, quality, or characteristics of the sewage delivered by each public agency.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

12813.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this article, the board may, in its discretion, finance any sewage disposal or solid waste resource recovery enterprise, the interest on and retirement of any bonded indebtedness therefor, and provide for the maintenance and operation thereof entirely by the levy and collection of taxes upon the property within the special district for which the enterprise is constructed or operated, or by rates and charges imposed upon the users of the facilities of the enterprise, or by both taxes, rates, and charges, apportionment of expenses among public agencies served, or any combination of the foregoing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

12814.

A district may add fluorine or fluorine compounds to the water supply of the district only if the voters of the district have approved the addition of the fluorine and fluorine compounds to the water supply. If a majority of the voters of a district voting upon the proposition at an election called and held as prescribed in Section 12815 have voted in favor of the addition of fluorine and fluorine compounds to the water supply of the district, the district shall, subject to Article 1 (commencing with Section 116275), of Chapter 4 of Part 12 of Division 104 of,
 and Sections 116325, 116340, 116345, and 116500 of, the Health and Safety Code, add to water intended for consumption or use by the public, including domestic, industrial, and other uses, fluorine and fluorine compounds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 411.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12815.

The board may call a special election at any time for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the proposition as to whether or not the voters approve the addition of fluorine and fluorine compounds to the public water supply of the district. The ordinance calling an election shall fix the date on which the election shall be held, the wording of the proposition and the manner of holding the election and of voting for or against the proposition. The election shall be consolidated, in the manner provided in Section 13209, with a statewide primary or general election. The ordinance shall be published. Another election in the district on the same or substantially
 the same proposition shall not be called by the board, pursuant to this section or Section 12815.1, within four years after such election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1098.)
-------------------------------------------

12815.1.

The board shall adopt an ordinance, in accordance with Section 12815, calling an election for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the proposition as to whether or not the voters approve the addition of fluorine and fluorine compounds to the public water supply of the district, when a petition for the election has been filed with, and certified as sufficient by, the secretary of the district. The election shall be conducted in accordance with Section 12815. Petitions meeting the requirements of Sections 12814 to 12816, inclusive, shall be
 in lieu of the initiative procedure provided by Article 1 (commencing with Section 9300) of Chapter 4 of Division 9 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 183.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12815.2.

Petitions which meet the requirements of this article shall be certified as sufficient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1098.)
-------------------------------------------

12815.3.

Before circulating the petition, its proponents shall publish a notice of intention to do so. The notice shall be accompanied by a printed statement, not exceeding 500 words in length, stating the reasons for the petition. The notice and statement shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation which is published in the district.

Within 10 days after notice is published, the proponents shall file a copy of such notice and the accompanying statement, and an affidavit as to the publishing thereof, with the secretary. The petition may be circulated among the voters of the district twenty-one days after notice is
 published. The petition shall bear a copy of the printed notice of intention and its accompanying statement. Signatures shall be secured and the petition shall be presented to the secretary for filing within 180 days from the date of the first publication of the notice of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1098.)
-------------------------------------------

12815.4.

The petition shall declare that the public interest or necessity demands that a special election be called by the board of directors for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the proposition as to whether or not the voters approve the addition of fluorine and fluorine compounds to the public water supply of the district. The petition may be presented in sections, but each section shall contain a declaration of public interest or necessity, and shall have attached thereto an affidavit substantially in the same form as set forth in Section
 9022 of the Elections Code. In addition, each section shall be designed as set forth in Section 9020 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 184.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12815.5.

Any registered voter who is a resident of the district may circulate the petition anywhere within the district. Each section of the petition shall bear the name of a county, and only registered voters of that county shall sign such section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1098.)
-------------------------------------------

12815.6.

The petition shall be filed by the proponents, or by any person or persons authorized, in writing, by the proponents. All sections of the petition shall be filed at one time. When the petition is presented for filing, the secretary shall determine the total number of signatures affixed to the petition. If, from this examination, the secretary determines that the petition has been signed by at least 5 percent of the registered voters in the district, then the secretary shall accept the petition for filing. The petition shall be deemed as filed on that date. Any sections of the petition not so filed shall be void for all purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1098, Sec. 7.5.)
-------------------------------------------

12815.7.

If the petition contains more than 500 signatures, the secretary shall, within 30 days from the date such petition is filed, verify such signatures by means of a random sampling. The random sample of signatures shall be drawn in such a manner that every signature filed with the secretary is given an equal opportunity to be included in the sample. Such a random sampling shall include an examination of at least 500 or 5 percent of the signatures, whichever is greater.

If the projection made from the random sampling as to signature validity shows the number of valid signatures as between 90 and 110 percent of the signatures needed to
 declare the petition sufficient, the secretary shall examine and verify each signature filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1098.)
-------------------------------------------

12815.8.

In determining valid signatures from voter registration records, the secretary may use the duplicate file of affidavits or may check the signatures against facsimiles of voter signatures, provided that the method of preparing and displaying the facsimiles complies with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1098.)
-------------------------------------------

12815.85.

The secretary shall attach to the petition, a certificate showing the result of the signature examination, and shall notify the proponents of either the sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1098.)
-------------------------------------------

12815.9.

If the petition is found insufficient, no action shall be taken on it. However, the failure to secure sufficient signatures shall not preclude the later filing of a new petition to the same effect.

If the petition is found to be sufficient, the secretary shall certify the results of the signature examination to the board at its next regular meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1098.)
-------------------------------------------

12816.

(a) At least 90 days prior to the election provided for in Sections 12815 and 12815.1, notice of the election shall be published within the district. Any voter or group of voters may prepare and file with the county elections official of the county containing the largest number of voters within the district an argument for or against the proposition to be submitted. The argument shall not be greater than 300 words in length. If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposition is filed within the time permitted
 the county elections official shall select one of the arguments for printing. No more than three signatures shall appear with any argument. The county elections official of each county in the district shall mail, or cause to be mailed, to each registered voter in that county in the district one copy of the argument for and one copy of the argument against the proposition. The arguments shall be mailed with the sample ballot.

(b) Based on the time reasonably necessary to prepare and print the arguments and sample ballots for the particular election, the county elections official shall fix and determine a reasonable date prior to the election after which no arguments for or against the proposition may be submitted for printing and distribution to the voters as provided in this section. Notice of the date fixed shall be published by the county elections official pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. Arguments may be changed up to and
 including the date fixed by the county elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12817.

A district may, through contract or otherwise, construct, maintain, improve and operate public recreational facilities appurtenant to any water reservoir owned or operated by the district, and the district may expend funds on such public recreational facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 337.)
-------------------------------------------

12818.

(a) No publicly owned utility shall commence the distribution or sale of water for municipal, domestic, industrial or similar purposes for, on, or to, any land within a district already engaged in similar distribution or sale of water and which land is already subject to the lien of a general obligation bonded indebtedness of the district for these purposes. However, a publicly owned utility may commence to provide the service to the land, otherwise prohibited, upon either of the following conditions:

(1) If the board of directors of the district shall by resolution permit the service.

(2) In any portion of the district proposed to be served by the publicly owned utility in which the total number of registered voters residing therein exceeds 200, and in which at least two-thirds of the voters shall have voted at a special district election to permit the service. The election shall be called and held as an initiative measure pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 9300) of Chapter 4 of Division 9 of the Elections Code.

(b) As used in this section, “district” shall mean only a municipal utility district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 185.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12819.

(a) Every district furnishing light, heat, or power shall expend no funds for advertising when the advertising encourages increased consumption of the services or commodities.

(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a district furnishing light, heat, or power from expending funds for advertising which encourages the more efficient operation of the facilities, works, or utilities of the district, or for advertising which encourages the more efficient use of light, heat, or
 power, the conservation of energy or natural resources, or presents accurate information on the economical purchase, maintenance, or use of any appliance or device using light, heat, or power.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a district furnishing light, heat, or power from expending funds for advertising for the purposes of economic development that benefits ratepayers, retaining customers, marketing competitive services and commodities, or promoting electrotechnologies that enhance productivity or provide environmental benefits, within or without the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 175, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12819.5.

Whenever a business transaction of a municipal utility district furnishing electricity, gas, water service where the utility has 10,000 or more service connections, or telephone service is such that a personal appearance by a person is required by the district and the person is unable to appear at the district’s place of business during the district’s usual business hours, then the district shall provide a reasonable and convenient alternative to the person such as an appointment outside the district’s usual business hours or allowing the person to conduct the
 transaction by telephone, mail, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 614, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12820.

(a) A district may employ a suitable security force. The employees of the district that are designated by the general manager as security officers shall have the authority and powers conferred by subdivision (a) of Section 830.34 of the Penal Code upon peace officers. The district shall adhere to the standards for recruitment and training of peace officers established by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training pursuant to Title 4 (commencing with Section 13500) of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(b) Every security officer employed by a district shall conform
 to the standards for peace officers of the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. Any officer who fails to conform to these standards shall not continue to have the powers of a security officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1165, Sec. 45.)
-------------------------------------------

12821.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 117070 or 117120 of the Health and Safety Code, any violation of a rule or regulation of a district adopted pursuant to Section 117060 or 117105 of the Health and Safety Code shall be a misdemeanor unless the district by ordinance declares the violations to be an infraction.
